Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 1. Programs and Courses of Instruction Generally.
§ 22.1-201.
Study of documents of Virginia history and United States Constitution.

To increase knowledge of citizens’ rights and responsibilities thereunder and to enhance the understanding of Virginia’s unique role in the history of the United States, the Declaration of American Independence, the general principles of the Constitution of the United States, including the Bill of Rights, the Virginia Statute of Religious Freedom, the charters of the Virginia Company of April 10, 1606, May 23, 1609, and March 12, 1612, and the Virginia Declaration of Rights shall be thoroughly explained and taught by teachers to pupils in public elementary, middle, and high schools. Emphasis shall be given to the relationship between these documents and Virginia history and to citizenship responsibilities inherent in the rights included in these documents. Each teacher shall ensure that all supplementary written materials that he uses to teach these documents contain accurate restatements of the principles contained in such documents. Written examinations as to each of such documents shall be given.

The Department of Education shall develop guidelines for supplementary written materials that teachers use to teach the Declaration of American Independence, the general principles of the Constitution of the United States, including the Bill of Rights, the Virginia Statute of Religious Freedom, the charters of the Virginia Company of April 10, 1606, May 23, 1609, and March 12, 1612, and the Virginia Declaration of Rights.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-234; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 69; 1980, c. 559; 1982, c. 354; 1991, c. 178; 1994, c. 693; 1999, c. 559; 2000, c. 504; 2014, c. 647.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 693, cl. 2, which provided for the expiration of the 1994 amendment by c. 693 to this section on July 1, 1995, was repealed by Acts 1995, c. 425, cl. 1.

Acts 2014, c. 647, cl. 2 was codified as the second paragraph in § 22.1-201 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 1999 amendment

inserted “including the Bill of Rights.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 504 added “To increase knowledge of citizens’ rights and responsibilities thereunder and to enhance the understanding of Virginia’s unique role in the history of the United States” at the beginning of the first sentence, and inserted “relationship between these documents and Virginia history, and to” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 647 inserted “of the Virginia Company” and deleted “of The Virginia Company” following “March 12, 1612” in the first sentence, added the third sentence, added the second paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

§ 22.1-202.
Instruction in history and principles of flags of United States and Virginia; pledge of allegiance to American flag; guidelines developed by the Board.

Instruction in the history and principles of the flag of the United States and the flag of the Commonwealth shall be given in one or more grades in every school division. The instruction shall include the pledge of allegiance and the appropriate etiquette and conventions for respecting the dignity and appropriate display of such flags.In recognition of the civic heritage of the United States of America, all students shall be required to learn the Pledge of Allegiance and to demonstrate such knowledge.

To promote compliance with constitutional restrictions as well as observance of constitutional rights, the Board of Education shall, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, develop guidelines on constitutional rights and restrictions relating to the recitation of the pledge of allegiance to the American flag in public schools.The Board’s guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions which address the following: the initiative and involvement of local school boards, individual schools, administrators, teachers, and students; the propriety and constitutionality of any recitation or participation requirements; appropriate etiquette and conventions for respecting the dignity and appropriate display of the flag of the United States and the flag of the Commonwealth; and relevant state and federal constitutional concerns, such as freedom of speech and religion.These guidelines shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). However, to provide appropriate opportunity for involvement by the general public, teachers, and local school boards, the Board of Education shall conduct public hearings prior to establishing such guidelines. Thirty days prior to conducting such hearings, the Board shall give written notice by mail of the date, time, and place of the hearings to all local school boards and any other persons requesting to be notified of the hearings and publish notice of its intention to hold such hearings in the Virginia Register of Regulations. Interested parties shall be given reasonable opportunity to be heard and present information prior to the adoption of such guidelines.

Each school board shall require the daily recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance in each classroom of the school division and shall ensure that the flag of the United States is in place in each such classroom. Each school board shall determine the appropriate time during the school day for the recitation of the Pledge. During such Pledge of Allegiance, students shall stand and recite the Pledge while facing the flag with their right hands over their hearts or in an appropriate salute if in uniform; however, no student shall be compelled to recite the Pledge if he, his parent or legal guardian objects on religious, philosophical or other grounds to his participating in this exercise. Students who are thus exempt from reciting the Pledge shall remain quietly standing or sitting at their desks while others recite the Pledge and shall make no display that disrupts or distracts others who are reciting the Pledge. School boards shall provide appropriate accommodations for students who are unable to comply with the procedures described herein due to disability.The school board’s code of conduct shall apply to disruptive behavior during the recitation of the Pledge in the same manner as provided for other circumstances of such behavior.

The Office of the Attorney General shall intervene on behalf of local school boards and shall provide legal defense of the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-165; 1980, c. 559; 1996, cc. 122, 124; 1998, c. 128; 2001, c. 666.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, to the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 666 added the second paragraph of subsection A, and added subsections C and D.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For 2003/2004 survey of education law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 183 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4C M.J. Constitutional Law, § 77.

§ 22.1-202.1.
Comparative religion as elective course.

The Board of Education shall authorize local school boards to offer, as an elective in grades nine through 12 with appropriate credits toward graduation, a comparative religion class that focuses on the basic tenets, history, and religious observances and rites of world religions.

History.

2004, cc. 939, 955; 2006, cc. 90, 161.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 939 and 955, cl. 2 provides: “That no educational standard set forth in this act, for which state funding is required, shall take effect unless the state’s share of funding that standard is included in the 2004 Appropriation Act, passed during the 2004 Session of the General Assembly and signed by the Governor.” See Editor’s note under § 22.1-253.13:2 and Acts 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, Items 146 B 6 b and 146 C 2 j.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 90 and 161 are identical, and substituted “The Board of Education shall authorize local school boards to offer” for “Local school boards shall authorize.”

§ 22.1-203.
Daily observance of one minute of silence.

In order that the right of every pupil to the free exercise of religion be guaranteed within the schools and that the freedom of each individual pupil be subject to the least possible pressure from the Commonwealth either to engage in, or to refrain from, religious observation on school grounds, the school board of each school division shall establish the daily observance of one minute of silence in each classroom of the division.

During such one-minute period of silence, the teacher responsible for each classroom shall take care that all pupils remain seated and silent and make no distracting display to the end that each pupil may, in the exercise of his or her individual choice, meditate, pray, or engage in any other silent activity which does not interfere with, distract, or impede other pupils in the like exercise of individual choice.

The Office of the Attorney General shall intervene and shall provide legal defense of this law.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-234.1; 1976, c. 103; 1980, c. 559; 2000, c. 1022.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1022 substituted “shall” for “authorized to” near the end of the introductory language, and in the second paragraph substituted “During” for “Where” and deleted “is instituted” following “period of silence” near the beginning, and added the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia law regarding children, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 939 (2000).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article surveying developments in education law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 89 (2002).

§ 22.1-203.1.
Student-initiated prayer.

In order that the right of every pupil to the free exercise of religion be guaranteed within the schools and that the freedom of each individual pupil not be subject to pressure from the Commonwealth either to engage in, or to refrain from, religious observation on school grounds, consistent with constitutional principles of freedom of religion and separation of church and state, students in the public schools may voluntarily engage in student-initiated prayer.

History.

1994, c. 799.

§ 22.1-203.2.
Guidelines for constitutional compliance for student prayer.

To promote compliance with constitutional restrictions as well as observance of constitutional rights, the Board of Education shall, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney General, develop guidelines on constitutional rights and restrictions relating to prayer and other religious expression in the public schools. The Board’s guidelines shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions that address the following: the initiative and involvement of local school boards, individual schools, administrators, teachers, and students; the use of school facilities and equipment, including audio systems, and class time for prayer or other religious expression; and relevant state and federal constitutional concerns, such as freedom of religion and speech and separation of church and state. These guidelines shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.). However, in order to provide appropriate opportunity for input from the general public, teachers, and local school boards, the Board of Education shall conduct public hearings prior to establishing such guidelines. Thirty days prior to conducting such hearings, the Board shall give written notice by mail of the date, time, and place of the hearings to all local school boards and any other persons requesting to be notified of the hearings and publish notice of its intention to hold such hearings in the Virginia Register of Regulations. Interested parties shall be given reasonable opportunity to be heard and present information prior to the adoption of such guidelines.

History.

1994, c. 801, § 22.1-280.3; 2001, cc. 688, 820.

Cross references.

As to exemptions under the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

§ 22.1-203.3.
Religious viewpoint expression; student expression.

Students may express their beliefs about religion in homework, artwork, and other written and oral assignments free from discrimination based on the religious content of their submissions. Home and classroom work shall be judged by ordinary academic standards of substance and relevance and other legitimate pedagogical concerns identified by the school.

History.

2008, c. 859.

§ 22.1-203.4.
Public high schools; Virginia voter registration.

Each public high school shall provide to any enrolled student who is of voting age or is eligible to register to vote pursuant to § 24.2-403 (i) mail voter registration applications and voter registration information provided by the Department of Elections or (ii) access to the Virginia online voter registration system on a school-owned computing device that is accessible to such student. Each student who is eligible to register to vote shall be provided the opportunity to complete an application form during the normal course of the school day.

History.

2020, c. 612.

§ 22.1-204.
Study of accident prevention.

In one or more of the elementary or secondary grades of every school division there shall be provided a course of study including elementary training in accident prevention, in proper conduct on streets and highways, in the operation of motor vehicles as required by the traffic laws of this Commonwealth, and in ways and means of preventing loss of lives and damage to property through preventable fires. Such course shall be required of every pupil completing the course of study in any such grade.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-235; 1962, c. 482; 1966, c. 208; 1968, c. 433; 1980, c. 559; 1991, c. 178.

§ 22.1-204.1.
Firearm safety education program.

Local school boards may provide firearm safety education programs for students in the elementary school grades. To assist local school boards electing to provide firearm safety education programs, the Board of Education shall establish curriculum guidelines for a standardized program of firearm safety education for the elementary school grades to promote the protection and safety of children enrolled in the public schools. The curriculum guidelines shall incorporate, among other principles of firearm safety, accident prevention and the rules upon which the Eddie Eagle Gunsafe Program offered by the National Rifle Association is based. Local school boards electing to provide firearm safety education shall offer instruction pursuant to the Board’s curriculum guidelines and shall integrate firearm safety education into appropriate subject areas, if feasible, to ensure that every elementary grade student completes the course of study in firearm safety education.

History.

2010, c. 859.

§ 22.1-204.2.
Hunter safety education programs for students in grades seven through 12.

Local school boards may provide after-school hunter safety education programs for students in the school division in grades seven through 12. Each student shall bear the cost of participating in such programs. Local school boards shall display information on its after-school hunter safety education programs in each school and distribute information to the parents of each student in the school division in grades seven through 12.

The Department of Wildlife Resources shall establish a uniform curriculum for such hunter safety education programs. Each such program shall be taught by a hunter safety instructor certified pursuant to §

29.1-300.2

.

History.

2014, c. 560; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in subsection B, first sentence.

§ 22.1-205.
Driver education programs.

The Board of Education shall establish for the public school system a standardized program of driver education in the safe operation of motor vehicles. Such program shall consist of classroom training and behind-the-wheel driver training. However, any student who participates in such a program of driver education shall meet the academic requirements established by the Board, and no student in a course shall be permitted to operate a motor vehicle without a license or other document issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2, or the comparable law of another jurisdiction, authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways.

The driver education program shall include (i) instruction concerning (a) alcohol and drug abuse; (b) aggressive driving; (c) the dangers of distracted driving and speeding; (d) motorcycle awareness; (e) organ and tissue donor awareness; (f) fuel-efficient driving practices; and (g) traffic stops, including law-enforcement procedures for traffic stops, appropriate actions to be taken by drivers during traffic stops, and appropriate interactions with law-enforcement officers who initiate traffic stops, and (ii) an additional minimum 90-minute parent/student driver education component as part of the classroom portion of the driver education curriculum. However, no student who is (1) at least 18 years of age, (2) an emancipated minor, or (3) an unaccompanied minor who is not in the physical custody of his parent or guardian shall be required to participate in the parent/student driver education component.

The parent/student driver education component shall be administered as part of the classroom portion of the driver education curriculum. In Planning District 8, the parent/student driver education component shall be administered in-person. Outside Planning District 8, the parent/student driver education component may be administered either in-person or online by a public school or a driver training school that is licensed as a computer-based driver education provider. The participation of the student’s parent or guardian in the parent/student driver education component shall be required in Planning District 8 unless the student is otherwise exempted from participation in the parent/student driver education component pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 1. Outside Planning District 8, the participation of the student’s parent or guardian in the parent/student driver education component shall be encouraged, but shall not be required. The program shall emphasize (i) parental responsibilities regarding juvenile driver behavior, (ii) juvenile driving restrictions pursuant to this Code, (iii) the dangers of driving while intoxicated and underage consumption of alcohol, and (iv) the dangers of distracted driving. Such instruction shall be developed by the Department in cooperation with the Virginia Alcohol Safety Action Program, the Department of Health, and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, as appropriate. Nothing in this subdivision precludes any school division from including a program of parental involvement as part of a driver education program in addition to the minimum 90-minute parent/student driver education component.

Any driver education program shall require a minimum number of miles driven during the behind-the-wheel driver training.

The Board shall assist school divisions by preparation, publication and distribution of competent driver education instructional materials to ensure a more complete understanding of the responsibilities and duties of motor vehicle operators.

Each school board shall determine whether to offer the program of driver education in the safe operation of motor vehicles and, if offered, whether such program shall be an elective or a required course. In addition to the fee approved by the Board of Education pursuant to the appropriation act that allows local school boards to charge a per pupil fee for behind-the-wheel driver education, the Board of Education may authorize a local school board’s request to assess a surcharge in order to further recover program costs that exceed state funds distributed through basic aid to school divisions offering driver education programs. Each school board may waive the fee or the surcharge in total or in part for those students it determines cannot pay the fee or surcharge. Only school divisions complying with the standardized program and regulations established by the Board of Education and the provisions of §

46.2-335

shall be entitled to participate in the distribution of state funds appropriated for driver education.

Each school board shall make the 90-minute parent/student driver education component available to all students and their parents or guardians who are in compliance with § 22.1-254.

The actual initial driving instruction shall be conducted, with motor vehicles equipped as may be required by regulation of the Board of Education, on private or public property removed from public highways if practicable; if impracticable, then, at the request of the school board, the Commissioner of Highways shall designate a suitable section of road near the school to be used for such instruction. Such section of road shall be marked with signs, which the Commissioner of Highways shall supply, giving notice of its use for driving instruction. Such signs shall be removed at the close of the instruction period. No vehicle other than those used for driver training shall be operated between such signs at a speed in excess of 25 miles per hour. Violation of this limit shall be a Class 4 misdemeanor.

The Board of Education may, in its discretion, promulgate regulations for the use and certification of paraprofessionals as teaching assistants in the driver education programs of school divisions.

The Board of Education shall approve correspondence courses for the classroom training component of driver education. These correspondence courses shall be consistent in quality with instructional programs developed by the Board for classroom training in the public schools. Students completing the correspondence courses for classroom training, who are eligible to take behind-the-wheel driver training, may receive behind-the-wheel driver training (i) from a public school, upon payment of the required fee, if the school division offers behind-the-wheel driver training and space is available, (ii) from a driver training school licensed by the Department of Motor Vehicles, or (iii) in the case of a home schooling parent or guardian instructing his own child who meets the requirements for home school instruction under § 22.1-254.1 or subdivision B 1 of § 22.1-254, from a behind-the-wheel training course approved by the Board. Nothing herein shall be construed to require any school division to provide behind-the-wheel driver training to nonpublic school students.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-235.1; 1962, c. 482; 1966, c. 208; 1968, c. 433; 1974, c. 154; 1980, c. 559; 1988, c. 105; 1989, c. 392; 1998, c. 96; 1999, c. 928; 2000, cc. 82, 651; 2001, cc. 659, 665; 2002, cc. 177, 386; 2003, c. 951; 2007, c. 278; 2009, cc. 785, 813, 840; 2010, c. 663; 2011, c. 346; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2017, c. 300; 2018, c. 521; 2020, cc. 1227, 1246; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 28, 74, 75; 2022, c. 708.

Cross references.

As to the punishment of Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

As to regulation of driver training schools, see §

46.2-1700

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2001, cc. 659 and 665, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act increasing the minimum age for applicants for Virginia driver’s licenses to sixteen years and three months shall not apply to applicants to whom Virginia learner’s permits were issued prior to July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2013, cc. 585 and 646, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to invalidate any action taken or approval rendered by the Commonwealth Transportation Board prior to July 1, 2013, and that any and all actions taken and all approvals rendered by the Board prior to July 1, 2013, shall remain valid and in effect unless modified, superseded, or repealed by subsequent action of the Board.”

Acts 2017, c. 300, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall collaborate with the Department of State Police to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1227 and 1246, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 436 R, as added by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the duration of a declared state of emergency and for up to 90 days after a declaration of a state of emergency has been rescinded or expires, the Commissioner may permit (1) Class B driver training schools and (2) computer-based driver education providers, as defined in §

46.2-1700

, to administer the end-of-course driver’s education test online subject to the requirements prescribed by the Commissioner. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the duration of a declared state of emergency and for up to 90 days after a declaration of a state of emergency has been rescinded or expires, the Commissioner may permit Class B driver training schools with a valid Virginia license to administer their in-class curriculum on an online platform subject to the requirements prescribed by the Commissioner. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 22.1-205, for the duration of a declared state of emergency and for up to 90 days after a declaration of a state of emergency has been rescinded or expires, the Commissioner may permit the parent/student driver education component of the driver’s education course to be administered online subject to the requirements prescribed by the Commissioner.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 74 and 75, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall emphasize the dangers of distracted driving and speeding in its Curriculum and Administrative Guide for Driver Education.”

The 1999 amendment

added subsection F.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 82 and 651 are identical, and in the fourth sentence of subsection A, deleted “and” at the end of clause (i), inserted “and” at the end of clause (ii), and added clause (iii).

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendments by cc. 659 and 665 are identical, and added the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 177, in the fourth sentence of subsection A, added clause (iii) and redesignated present clause (iv).

The 2002 amendment by c. 386, in subsection A, added present clause (v) in the fourth sentence and, in the fifth sentence, inserted “the Department of Health” and added “as appropriate.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 951 substituted “25” for “twenty-five” in subsection D; and in subsection F, deleted “or” preceding clause (ii), inserted “or” following clause (ii), and inserted clause (iii).

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 278 inserted the present second and third sentences of subsection C.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 785, in the fourth sentence of subsection A, added clause (vi) and made related changes.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the end of subsection A.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 663 inserted A (vi), redesignated former A (vi) as A (vii), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by c. 346 inserted the second paragraph of subsection C.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 585 and 646 are identical, and substituted “Commissioner of Highways” for “Commonwealth Transportation Board” in the first and second sentences in subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 300, in the fourth sentence of subsection A, inserted the clause (i) designation, redesignated former clauses (i) through (vi) as clauses (i)(a) through (f), inserted clause (i)(g), redesignated former clause (vii) as clause (ii); and deleted “included” preceding “as part of the in-classroom portion of the driver education curriculum.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 521, in subdivision A 1, substituted “1. The driver education program” for “The program,” substituted “an additional minimum 90-minute parent/student driver education component” for “for any student completing a driver education program beginning in academic year 2010-2011, an additional minimum 90-minute parent/student driver education component as part of the in-classroom portion of the driver education curriculum, requiring,” and added the last sentence; in subdivision A 2, inserted the first three sentences and “For students in Planning District 8 and those students in school divisions that offer the parent/student component” and “shall be required” in the fourth sentence and added the last sentence; and in subdivision A 3, substituted “3. Any driver education” for “Such” at the beginning; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1227 and 1246, effective January 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “other document” for “permit to do so” and added “under Chapter 3 (§

46.2-300

et seq.) of Title 46.2, or the comparable law of another jurisdiction, authorizing the operation of a motor vehicle upon the highways.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 28, effective July 1, 2021, added the last sentence in subdivision A 1; and in subdivision A 2, substituted “driver education component who are not otherwise exempted from participation in the parent/student driver education component pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 1” for “component” in the fourth sentence.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 74 and 75, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subdivision A 1 (c), inserted “the dangers of” at the beginning and added “and speeding” at the end.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 708, rewrote clause (ii) of subdivision A 1, which read: “in Planning District 8, an additional minimum 90-minute parent/ostudent driver education component. The additional parent/ostudent driver education component may be provided to students outside Planning District 8, at the discretion of each local school board. However, in any school division in which the parent/ostudent driver education component is required, no student who is (1) at least 18 years of age, (2) an emancipated minor, or (3) an unaccompanied minor who is not in the physical custody of his parent or guardian shall be required to participate in such component.”; in subdivision A 2, rewrote the third sentence, which read: “Outside Planning District 8, the parent/ostudent driver education component may be administered either in-person or online by a public school or driver training schools that are licensed as computer-based driver education providers.”, rewrote the fourth sentence, which read: “For students in Planning District 8 and those students in school divisions that offer the parent/ostudent driver education component who are not otherwise exempted from participation in the parent/ostudent driver education component pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 1, the participation of the student’s parent or guardian shall be required, and the program shall emphasize (i) parental responsibilities regarding juvenile driver behavior, (ii) juvenile driving restrictions pursuant to the Code of Virginia, and, (iii) the dangers of driving while intoxicated and underage consumption of alcohol.”, and in the last sentence, deleted “outside Planning District 8” following “division” and deleted “or as an alternative to” following “addition”; substituted “Each school board” for “School boards in Planning District 8” in the last paragraph of subsection C; and made stylistic changes.

§ 22.1-205.1.
High school student parking passes; valid driver’s license required.

Each public high school shall require any student who applies to obtain a pass to park a vehicle on school property to provide evidence that the student possesses a valid driver’s license or driver privilege card. The Department shall develop, and each public high school shall utilize, a standard application form for students to use to obtain a pass to park a vehicle on school property.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 74, 75.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021.

§ 22.1-206.
Instruction concerning drugs, alcohol, substance abuse, tobacco and nicotine products, and gambling.

Instruction concerning drugs and drug abuse shall be provided by the public schools as prescribed by the Board of Education.

Instruction concerning the public safety hazards and dangers of alcohol abuse, underage drinking, and drunk driving shall be provided in the public schools. The Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority shall provide educational materials to the Department of Education. The Department of Education shall review and shall distribute such materials as are approved to the public schools.

The Virginia Foundation for Healthy Youth shall develop and the Department of Education shall distribute to each local school division educational materials concerning the health and safety risks of using tobacco products, nicotine vapor products, and alternative nicotine products, as such terms are defined in §

18.2-371.2

. Instruction concerning the health and safety risks of using tobacco products, nicotine vapor products, and alternative nicotine products, as such terms are defined in §

18.2-371.2

, shall be provided in each public elementary and secondary school in the Commonwealth, consistent with such educational materials.

Instruction concerning gambling and the addictive potential thereof shall be provided by the public schools as prescribed by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 22-235.1; 1972, c. 248; 1980, c. 559; 2001, c. 452; 2015, cc. 38, 730; 2019, c. 577; 2022, c. 192.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2015, cc. 38 and 730, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2017, cc. 698 and 707, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 15, 2018, except that the provisions of the (i) thirteenth, fourteenth, and fifteenth enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2015; (ii) third enactment of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2018; and (iii) eleventh enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts
2022, c. 192, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education shall report to the Chairmen of House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health a description of the instruction concerning gambling and the addictive potential thereof that it prescribes pursuant to subsection D of
§ 22.1-206 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 452 added the subsection A designator, and added subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 38 and 730 are identical, effective January 15, 2018, and substituted “Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority” for “Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control” in the second sentence of subsection B.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 577 added subsection C.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 192 added subsection D.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

§ 22.1-206.1.
Lyme disease; instructional resources and materials.

The Secretary of Education, in collaboration with the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Secretary of Natural and Historic Resources, shall develop instructional resources and materials to assist school boards and local and regional public libraries in establishing an education and awareness program to protect children from Lyme disease and other tick-borne infections. Such instructional resources and materials (i) shall be appropriate for individuals of school age; (ii) shall provide information on the identification of ticks, recommended procedures for safe tick removal, and best practices to provide protection from ticks; (iii) may include video productions, pamphlets, and demonstration programs to illustrate the sizes of various ticks, including sizes before and after each variety has become engorged, to assist with the identification of a tick and the reaction on the skin that may result from a tick bite; and (iv) shall be made available to school boards and local and regional public libraries upon request at no charge.

History.

2022, c. 303.